Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 2. State Board of Control

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-4-201.
Created; members; location of office; meetings generally; state engineer ex officio president; quorum.

There is hereby constituted a state board of control composed of the state engineer and the superintendents of the four (4) water divisions. The board shall have an office with the state engineer at Cheyenne. The board shall hold regular quarterly meetings each year, the dates to be set by the board. Other meetings shall be held at the call of the president for the transaction of business as may come before it. Special meetings of the board may be called by the president after a request for a special meeting is made by a party seeking board action which cannot be accommodated at a regular meeting. The party or parties making a request shall make payment to the board of control to cover all costs of travel and per diem expenses incidental to the special meeting. The state engineer is ex officio president of the board, and may vote on all questions coming before it. A majority of all the members of the board constitutes a quorum to transact business.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 19; 1895, ch. 62, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 857; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 761; C.S. 1920, § 882; Laws 1927, ch. 86, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-101; C.S. 1945, § 71-201; Laws 1953, ch. 32, § 1; 1955, ch. 69, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-154; Laws 1977, ch. 97, § 1.

Constitutionality. —

Legislature can authorize supervision and control of appropriation and distribution of public waters of the state by administrative officers, pursuant to adjudicated priorities, and fact that a water official may make a wrongful distribution of water in particular cases, or erroneously open a watergate to pass water for an appropriator whose right is denied by another, are not grounds for holding statutes unconstitutional. Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

§ 41-4-202.
Ex officio secretary of the board; duties generally.

The ex officio secretary of the state board of control shall be appointed by the board and be an employee of the state engineer. The duties of the secretary shall, under direction of the president of the board, consist of keeping a full, true and complete record of the transactions of the state board of control, and to certify, under seal, all certificates of appropriation made according to law, and to perform other duties as may be required by the board.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 59, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 858; Laws 1903, ch. 41, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 762; Laws 1919, ch. 40, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 883; Laws 1927, ch. 86, § 2; 1929, ch. 86, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-102; Laws 1933, ch. 86, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-202; W.S. 1957, § 41-155; Laws 1989, ch. 94, § 1.

Cross references. —

For duty of clerk of district court to transmit copy of judgment relative to appeal from board of control to secretary of board of control, and as to duty of secretary to record same, see §

41-4-407

.

For duty of secretary of board of control to issue instructions to superintendents of water divisions with reference to judgments, orders or decrees issued by district court, see §

41-4-407

.

§ 41-4-203.
Collection of fees generally.

The secretary of the state board of control shall collect in advance reasonable fees not to exceed the following:

One hundred dollars ($100.00) with each proof of appropriation of water or proof of construction of a reservoir;

For recording with county clerks any water right instrument or certificate not otherwise specifically provided for, the fees required in accordance with W.S.

18-3-402

;

For making copies of any document recorded or filed in the office of the state board of control, a reasonable fee shall be assessed not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per page.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 104, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-133; C.S. 1945, § 71-256; W.S. 1957, § 41-156; Laws 1965, ch. 178, § 2; 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1993, ch. 123, § 1; 2017 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), substituted “One hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “Fifty dollars ($50.00).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-4-204.
Collection of fees; disposition generally.

Said secretary shall, out of the fees so collected, remit with each certificate or order of the state board of control, sent to a county clerk for recording, the statutory fee for recording such instrument and pay all costs of advertising each proof of appropriation of water or proof of construction of reservoir; all other fees so collected to be paid to the state treasurer as by law provided.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 104, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-134; C.S. 1945, § 71-257; W.S. 1957, § 41-157; 2017 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “and pay all costs of advertising each proof of appropriation of water or proof of construction of reservoir.”

§ 41-4-205.
State board of control; additional fees.

The secretary of the board of control shall collect fees, not to exceed the following which shall be paid in advance, and turned over to the state treasurer:

For making copies of the records of the board of control or of papers or documents filed with the board, ten dollars ($10.00) for each page;

For attaching certificate and seal of the board to each document or documents requested, ten dollars ($10.00).

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 62, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 887; Laws 1905, ch. 26, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 792; C.S. 1920, § 913; R.S. 1931, § 122-132; C.S. 1945, § 71-236; W.S. 1957, § 41-157; Laws 1965, ch. 178, § 3; 1993, ch. 123, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-4-206.
Duty at first meeting.

It shall be the duty of said board at its first meeting to make proper arrangements for beginning the determination of priorities of right to the use of the public waters of the state, which determination shall begin on the streams most used for irrigation, and be continued as rapidly as practicable, until all the claims for appropriation now on record shall have been adjudicated.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 859; C.S. 1910, § 763; C.S. 1920, § 884; R.S. 1931, § 122-103; C.S. 1945, § 71-203; W.S. 1957, § 41-159.

Cross references. —

See also §

41-4-301

as to duties of board at first meeting. As to procedure for adjudication, see §§

41-4-301

through

41-4-328

.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions herein are constitutional. Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

This section is retroactive;

hence a party whose right accrued prior to the adoption of the constitution must present proof of his claim to the board for adjudication. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

This section was valid in construing title of original act.

Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

No prescriptive rights. —

Since 1890 when water rights were required to be initiated by permit from state engineer, it is settled that prescriptive right to state waters cannot obtain. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

The board of control has discretion in deciding what are streams.

Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Notice required prior to adjudication. —

In action to quiet title to water right, notice of adjudication of Big Laramie River having been appropriately given, evidence of which was offered by plaintiff, was sufficient to show that board of control had jurisdiction to adjudicate rights in that stream, thus giving defendants and all similarly situated prima facie right to water therefrom adjudicated to them, also showing their interest in controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Recital in water adjudication decree, by state board of control, that due notice had been given to interested parties, carries same presumption in favor of such inferior tribunal as obtains with respect of courts of general jurisdiction to show jurisdiction of the parties. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Opportunity to present claim. —

Original appropriators, predecessors of plaintiffs, having been afforded full opportunity to present their claims for adjudication of water rights, were not deprived of any constitutional right, and plaintiffs are in no better position. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Presumption that board acted correctly. —

In action to quiet title to water right prescriptively claimed by plaintiffs in Little Laramie River, allegation in defendant's answer that board of control had adjudicated a water right to predecessor of plaintiff, which was admitted, carried with it presumption of appearance and also of regularity, and all objections to pleadings must be overruled. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In action to quiet title to water rights, independently of scope of §

41-4-311

, plaintiffs pleaded prescriptive right thereto in Little Laramie watershed, to which defendants answered, in part, setting up decrees of predecessor of plaintiffs, and, not being denied, presumption of correctness of these decrees arose, making further pleading or proof of correctness unnecessary. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In adjudication nearly 50 years ago, by state board of control, of water rights on Little Laramie River, though failing to recite that notice was given interested parties, when the attack is collateral, it will be presumed that adjudication was after appearance, whether with or without notice being immaterial. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

If any tribunal has unlimited jurisdiction over a class of cases, it stands on same footing as courts of general jurisdiction respecting presumptions of regularity, including the presumption that due notice was given. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Jurisdiction of courts. —

Jurisdiction of courts, in matters of water adjudication is, aside from appeals, confined to determining rights in individual cases, to the extent that the board of control has not acted. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Standing to attack another's right. —

Before a party may attack right of another, either on constitutional or other grounds, he must show an interest which is affected, or right invaded, which cannot obtain where plaintiff enjoys a decreed water right which cannot be enlarged. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Effect of pleadings. —

In an action to quiet title to water rights claimed by prescription in Little Laramie River, answer setting up defense of decrees by board of control in Big Laramie River, admission by plaintiffs that the board of control had initiated a proceeding and decreed rights in latter river and its tributaries, while denying all other allegations, effect is that decree itself only is questioned and fact that it is of a priority different in time and amount than averred was immaterial, defendant not being required to anticipate such attack at the trial. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Estoppel. —

Section

41-4-310

estops water users under decrees of state board of control from claiming any other or greater rights than thereunder, and in a suit to obtain enlarged rights not only testimony offered but that admitted, in support of the petition, was immaterial and had no tendency to establish any rights in plaintiff. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Copy of decree as evidence. —

A copy of the record of the decree of adjudication, certified by the clerk of the board of control as a true and correct copy of original decree, is admissible as evidence. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Where photostatic copies of pen and ink records of decrees in board of control show nothing more suspicious than interlineations, interlineations will not prevent admission of them as evidence, when properly certified, especially when they are ancient documents. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Fact that certified copy of a judicial proceeding omits signature of judge to the record will not render copy inadmissible, especially if signature of judge was not necessary to validity of original record, and there is no statute requiring record of board of control to be signed by any officer. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 41-4-207.
Copies of judgments involving water rights to be sent to board.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of each district court in the state of Wyoming, upon the rendering of judgment by such court in each and every case wherein is involved in any way, any question affecting the title to any water right, irrigating or water system of any kind whatever, to forthwith prepare, free of charge, a certified copy of such judgment and forward the same to the state board of control.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 104, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 797; Laws 1917, ch. 26, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 918; R.S. 1931, § 122-139; C.S. 1945, § 71-262; W.S. 1957, § 41-160.

Records. —

Decrees of courts in action to determine interests in irrigation works, constituted a “record” within statute relating to adjudication of rights. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911).

§ 41-4-208.
Tabulations and supplements of adjudicated water rights; publication generally; contents; appropriations.

The president of the state board of control shall upon the taking effect of this act, employ competent assistants to compile and edit revised tabulations of adjudicated water rights in each of the four (4) water divisions of the state at such times as the president of the state board of control deems it necessary, and to compile and edit supplements to these tabulations every two (2) years, and shall furnish the necessary supplies for such compilation. These tabulations shall contain the information on adjudicated water rights according to precedent heretofore established, with whatever improvement of arrangement of the subject matter is decided advisable by the president of the board.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 76, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-161; Laws 1969, ch. 98, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to definition and description of water division, see §

41-3-501

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” refers to Laws 1955, ch. 76, § 1, which became effective March 1, 1955.

§ 41-4-209.
Tabulations and supplements of adjudicated water rights; adequate copies to be printed; president to direct.

Adequate copies, as determined by the president of the state board of control, of the tabulation of adjudicated water rights and supplements shall be printed under the direction of the president of the state board of control upon a printing contract let by the department of administration and information, general services division, procurement.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 76, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-162; Laws 1969, ch. 98, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “department of administration and information, general services division, procurement” for “state board of supplies.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 41-4-210.
Tabulations of adjudicated water rights; distribution and sale of copies; disposition of proceeds.

The state board of control is hereby instructed to deposit with the state library five (5) copies for use therein and to distribute sufficient copies for administrative purposes to the water division superintendents and water commissioners and their assistants. The balance of the copies of the complete tabulations of adjudicated water rights in Water Divisions Nos. 1, 2, 3 and 4 shall be safely kept by the board of control for sale at a reasonable price to be determined by the board. Funds derived from the sale of such volumes shall be paid into the general fund of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 76, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-163; Laws 1969, ch. 98, § 3; 1975, ch. 46, § 1.

§ 41-4-211.
Authority to administer oaths; rulemaking authorized.

The members of the board of control shall administer oaths in all cases where it is necessary in the performance of their official duties.

The board of control may adopt reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the duties imposed by law on the board of control. The rules and regulations may specify that the applicant shall pay the cost of advertising.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 62, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 885; C.S. 1910, § 790; C.S. 1920, § 911; R.S. 1931, § 122-130; C.S. 1945, § 71-235; W.S. 1957, § 41-164; Laws 1979, ch. 56, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute. Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).